Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Livestock Dealers

257.510.
Definitions for KRS 257.520 and 257.530. [Repealed.]

257.520.
Exceptions. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

257.530.
License required — Renewal, records of transactions — Violations — License revocation or suspension — Review by Franklin Circuit Court. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]

257.540.
Restriction on regulations. [Repealed, reenacted and amended.]